Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.24.150 and 2017 c 281 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The business and professions account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses, registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following chapters must be deposited into the account:(a) Chapter 18.08 RCW, architects, except as provided in RCW 18.08.510;(b) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;(((b)))(c) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists;(((c)))(d) Chapter 18.39 RCW, embalmers and funeral directors;(e) Chapter 18.96 RCW, landscape architects;(f) Chapter 18.140 RCW, certified real estate appraisers;(g) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;(((d)))(h) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;(((e)))(i) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;(((f)))(j) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;(((g)))(k) Chapter 18.220 RCW, geologists;(l) Chapter 18.280 RCW, home inspectors;(((h)))(m) Chapter 18.310 RCW, appraisal management companies;(n) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;(((i)))(o) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;(((j)))(p) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;(((k)))(q) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;(((l)))(r) Chapter 42.45 RCW, notaries public;(((m)))(s) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares;(((n)))(t) Chapter 67.08 RCW, boxing, martial arts, and wrestling;(((o)))(u) Chapter 68.05 RCW, funeral and cemetery board;(v) Chapter 18.300 RCW, body art, body piercing, and tattooing;(((p)))(w) Chapter 79A.60 RCW, whitewater river outfitters;(((q)))(x) Chapter 19.158 RCW, commercial telephone solicitation; and(((r)))(y) Chapter 19.290 RCW, scrap metal businesses.Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the department. Any residue in the account must be accumulated and may not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium. ((However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium the legislature may transfer to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.))(2) The director must biennially prepare a budget request based on the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which must include the estimated income from these business and professions fees.(3) The director is required to provide an annual report on or before the 30th day of each September, beginning in 2026, detailing the revenues and expenditures for each chapter authorized to use the business and professions account in subsection (1) of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 18.08.240 (Architects' license account) and 2018 c 207 s 9, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 2, 1985 c 57 s 4, & 1959 c 323 s 15;(2) RCW 18.39.810 (Funeral and cemetery account) and 2018 c 299 s 919 & 2009 c 102 s 24;(3) RCW 18.96.210 (Landscape architects' license account) and 2009 c 370 s 17;(4) RCW 18.140.260 (Real estate appraiser commission account) and 2005 c 339 s 20 & 2002 c 86 s 241;(5) RCW 18.220.120 (Geologists' account) and 2000 c 253 s 13; and(6) RCW 18.310.160 (Appraisal management company account) and 2010 c 179 s 16.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Any residual balance of funds remaining, as of December 31, 2025, in the architects' license account except as provided in RCW 18.08.510, the funeral and cemetery account, the landscape architects' license account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the geologists' account, and the appraisal management company account must be transferred to the business and professions account in RCW 43.24.150. The treasurer shall make the transfer after being notified by the office of financial management that it has completed the financial statement for fiscal year 2025, and no later than February 28, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. This act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---